tests/numerals.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Dative -GA":
    10<num><subst><dat> : 10-га
    19<num><subst><dat> : 19-ка
    2<num><subst><dat> : 2-е
    3<num><subst><dat> : 3-е
    4<num><subst><dat> : 4-е
    1<num><subst><dat> : 1-ге
    21<num><subst><dat> : 21-ге
    52<num><subst><dat> : 52-ге
    62<num><subst><dat> : 62-ге
    100<num><subst><dat> : 100-ке
    3<num><subst><dat> : 3-ке
    23<num><subst><dat> : 23-ке
    4<num><subst><dat> : 4-ке
    14<num><subst><dat> : 14-ке
    2014<num><subst><dat> : 2014-ке
    18<num><subst><dat> : 18-ке

  "Locative -DA": 
    10<num><subst><loc> : 10-да
    6<num><subst><loc> : 6-да
    16<num><subst><loc> : 16-да
    26<num><subst><loc> : 26-да
    27<num><subst><loc> : 27-та
    9<num><subst><loc> : 9-та
    19<num><subst><loc> : 19-та
    29<num><subst><loc> : 29-та
    20<num><subst><loc> : 20-де
    30<num><subst><loc> : 30-де
    1<num><subst><loc> : 1-де
    11<num><subst><loc> : 11-де
    21<num><subst><loc> : 21-де
    31<num><subst><loc> : 31-де
    2<num><subst><loc> : 2-де
    12<num><subst><loc> : 12-де
    22<num><subst><loc> : 22-де
    4<num><subst><loc> : 4-де
    5<num><subst><loc> : 5-де
    25<num><subst><loc> : 25-де
    7<num><subst><loc> : 7-де
    17<num><subst><loc> : 17-де
    27<num><subst><loc> : 27-де
    3<num><subst><loc> : 3-те
    13<num><subst><loc> : 13-те
    23<num><subst><loc> : 23-те
    4<num><subst><loc> : 4-те
    14<num><subst><loc> : 14-те
    24<num><subst><loc> : 24-те
    5<num><subst><loc> : 5-те
    15<num><subst><loc> : 15-те
    25<num><subst><loc> : 25-те
    8<num><subst><loc> : 8-те
    18<num><subst><loc> : 18-те
    28<num><subst><loc> : 28-те

  "Allative -Je":
    11<num><subst><all> : 11-же
    21<num><subst><all> : 21-же

  "Accusative -NI":
    1<num><subst><acc> : 1-ни
    12<num><subst><acc> : 12-ни
    8<num><subst><acc> : 8-ти

  "Ablative -DAн": 
    6<num><subst><abl> : 6-дан
    16<num><subst><abl> : 16-дан
    9<num><subst><abl> : 9-тан
    20<num><subst><abl> : 20-ден
    30<num><subst><abl> : 30-ден
    50<num><subst><abl> : 50-ден
    1<num><subst><abl> : 1-ден
    21<num><subst><abl> : 21-ден
    2<num><subst><abl> : 2-ден
    12<num><subst><abl> : 12-ден
    4<num><subst><abl> : 4-ден
    7<num><subst><abl> : 7-ден
    17<num><subst><abl> : 17-ден
    100<num><subst><abl> : 100-тен
    200<num><subst><abl> : 200-тен
    3<num><subst><abl> : 3-тен
    23<num><subst><abl> : 23-тен
    4<num><subst><abl> : 4-тен
    14<num><subst><abl> : 14-тен
    24<num><subst><abl> : 24-тен
    5<num><subst><abl> : 5-тен
    28<num><subst><abl> : 28-тен

  "Genitive -NIң":
    80<num><subst><gen> : 80-ниң
    1<num><subst><gen> : 1-ниң
    11<num><subst><gen> : 11-ниң
    31<num><subst><gen> : 31-ниң
    17<num><subst><gen> : 17-ниң
    8<num><subst><gen> : 8-тиң
    18<num><subst><gen> : 18-тиң
    4<num><subst><gen> : 4-түң
    2014<num><subst><gen> : 2014-түң
    6<num><subst><gen> : 6-ның
    26<num><subst><gen> : 26-ның

  "Miscellaneous":
    3<num><subst><nom> : 3-ң
    30<num><subst><nom> : 30-ин
    21<num><subst><nom> : 21-ин
    26<num><subst><px3sp><nom> : 26-зы

  "Ordinals -GI":
    5<num><ord> : 5-ки
    3<num><ord> : 3-кү
    15<num><ord> : 15-ки
